Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5016.09
Death or disability of party; transfer of property; effect on proceeding.

An appeal or petition shall not be dismissed by reason of the death or other disability of a party or by the transfer of any interest in property during its pendency. In the case of the death or other disability of a party, the commission may allow the action to continue by the party's representative or successor in interest. In case of any other transfer of interest in property, the action may be continued in the name of the original party or the commission may allow the party to whom the transfer is made to be substituted in the action in accordance with the party's interests.

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 60.